Utah statutes.
53A-11a-301.   Bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, hazing, and retaliation policy.

(1)  On or before September 1, 2012, each school board shall adopt a bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, and hazing policy consistent with this chapter.

(2)  The policy shall:

(a)  be developed only with input from:

(i)  students;

(ii)  parents;

(iii)  teachers;

(iv)  school administrators;

(v)  school staff; or

(vi)  local law enforcement agencies; and

(b)  provide protection to a student, regardless of the student's legal status.

(3)  The policy shall include the following components:

(a)  definitions of bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, and hazing that are consistent with this chapter;

(b)  language prohibiting bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, and hazing;

(c)  language prohibiting retaliation against an individual who reports conduct that is prohibited under this chapter; and

(d)  language prohibiting making a false report of bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, hazing, or retaliation.

(4)  A copy of the policy shall be included in student conduct handbooks and employee handbooks.

(5)  A policy may not permit formal disciplinary action that is based solely on an anonymous report of bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, hazing, or retaliation.

(6)  Nothing in this chapter is intended to infringe upon the right of a school employee or student to exercise their right of free speech.



Amended by Chapter 235, 2011 General Session

